Arkansas, session 2025, HB1290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title. This act shall be known and may be
cited as the "Arkansas Support of Mental Health Wellness Examinations Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Coverage for Mental Health Wellness Examinations

23-79-2901. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to require coverage under a health
benefit plan for mental health wellness examinations in an effort to promote
greater utilization of mental health wellness examinations and strengthen the
mental health of Arkansans.

*ANS054*
04-07-2025 11:19:25 ANS054

As Engrossed: H2/6/25 H2/11/25 H2/20/25 H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1290
23-79-2902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan or a
policy or contract for healthcare services offered, issued, renewed,
delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer; and
(ii) A health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-
61-1001 et seq., or any successor program.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan;
(2)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity subject to the
insurance laws of this state or the jurisdiction of the Insurance
Commissioner that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance
coverage, including without limitation an insurance company, a hospital and
04-07-2025 11:19:25 ANS054

As Engrossed: H2/6/25 H2/11/25 H2/20/25 H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1290
medical service corporation, a health maintenance organization, a self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state, or the Arkansas Medicaid
Program.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(3) "Mental health professional" means an individual licensed
by the state to provide mental health services, limited to the following:
(A) A physician or psychiatrist;
(B) A medical officer of the United States Government;
(C) A psychologist or clinical psychologist;
(D) A nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist with
a psychiatric, primary care, or mental health population focus licensed to
engage in advanced practice nursing;
(E) A licensed clinical social worker;
(F) A licensed marriage and family therapist;
(G) A licensed professional counselor; and
(H) A physician assistant; and
(4) "Mental health wellness examination" means an examination
that includes without limitation:
(A) A behavioral health screening;
(B) Education and consultation on health, wellness, and
behavioral changes;
(C) Referrals to ongoing treatment, mental health
services, and other supports as clinically appropriate;
(D) Age-appropriate screenings or observations to
understand an individual's mental health history, personal history, and
mental cognitive state; and
(E) If appropriate, relevant adult input through
screenings, interviews, and questions.

23-79-2903. Coverage for mental health wellness examinations.
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, a health benefit plan that is
offered, issued, renewed, delivered, or extended in this state shall provide
coverage for an annual standalone mental health wellness examination that is
performed by a licensed mental health professional to the extent permitted by
federal law.
04-07-2025 11:19:25 ANS054

As Engrossed: H2/6/25 H2/11/25 H2/20/25 H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1290
(b) The coverage for mental health wellness examinations under
subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) Be no less extensive than the coverage provided for
preventive services or primary care benefits under a health benefit plan;
(2) Comply with the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health
Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, Pub. L. No. 110-343; and
(3)(A) Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(3)(B) and (C) of
this section, not be subject to an annual deductible, copayment, coinsurance
limit, or any other cost-sharing requirements.
(B) Cost-sharing may be required if the applicable health
benefit plan is governed by the federal Internal Revenue Code and the health
benefit plan would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition
on cost-sharing requirements for a mental health wellness examination.
(C) Cost-sharing is required for a health benefit plan
issued by a healthcare insurer to a state entity under § 21-5-401 et seq.

23-79-2904. Rules.
(a) The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules to implement
this subchapter.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall promulgate
rules necessary to implement this subchapter that may apply to the Arkansas
Medicaid Program or the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, § 23-
61-1001 et seq.
(c) The State Board of Finance shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement this subchapter that may apply to the State and Public School Life
and Health Insurance Program.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective on and after January
1, 2026.

/s/L. Johnson





04-07-2025 11:19:25 ANS054